Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 7 Nominations and Primary Elections
7-7-203. Dates.

(a)

The general primary election shall be held:

(1)

For years in which the office of Governor will appear on the ballot at the general election, on the third Tuesday in June preceding the general election; and

(2)

For years in which the office of President of the United States will appear on the ballot at the general election, on the Tuesday four (4) weeks following the preferential primary election.

(b)

The preferential primary election shall be held:

(1)

For years in which the office of Governor will appear on the ballot at the general election, on the Tuesday four (4) weeks before the general primary election; and

(2)

For years in which the office of President of the United States will appear on the ballot at the general election, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March.

(c)(1)

The party filing period shall be a one-week period beginning and ending on the following dates and times:

(A)

For years in which the office of Governor will appear on the ballot at the general election, beginning at 12:00 noon one (1) week prior to the first day in March and ending at 12:00 noon on the first day in March; and

(B)

For years in which the office of President of the United States will appear on the ballot at the general election, beginning at 12:00 noon on the first Monday in November preceding the general primary election and ending at 12:00 noon on the seventh day thereafter.

(2)

Party pledges, if any, and affidavits of eligibility shall be filed, any filing fees of a political party, if any, shall be paid, and party certificates shall be issued by the party during regular office hours during the party filing period.

(3)

A party certificate and the political practices pledge shall be filed with the county clerk or the Secretary of State, as the case may be, during regular office hours during the party filing period.

(4)

The name of a candidate who fails to file a party certificate and political practices pledge by the filing deadline with the Secretary of State or county clerk, as the case may be, shall not appear on the ballot.

(5)

Party pledges, if any, shall be filed, filing fees, if any, shall be paid, and party certificates and political practices pledges shall be filed for special primary elections on or before the deadline established by proclamation of the Governor or other entity authorized to call a special primary election.

(d)(1)

At least seventy-five (75) days before the preferential primary election, the Secretary of State shall certify to the various county committees and to the various county boards of election commissioners a list of the names of all candidates who have filed party certificates with the Secretary of State within the time required by law.

(2)

At least seventy-five (75) days before the preferential primary election, the county clerk shall certify to the county committees and to the county board of election commissioners a list of the names of all candidates who have filed party certificates with the county clerk within the time required by law.

(e)(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall convene, at the time specified in the notice to the members given by the chair of the board, no later than the tenth day after each primary election for the purpose of canvassing the returns and certifying the election results.

(2)

If no time is specified for the meeting of the county board of election commissioners, the meeting shall be at 5:00 p.m.

(f)

The county convention of a political party holding a primary election shall be held:

(1)

No sooner than the day after the general primary election is held or, if no general primary election is held, no sooner than the day after the preferential primary election is held; and

(2)

No later than one hundred (100) days before the general election.

(g)(1)(A)

The county board of election commissioners shall certify to the county clerk and the county committee a list of all candidates who received the most votes or are unopposed on the ballot for county, township, and municipal offices, and the political parties' county committee members and delegates.

(B)

The list under subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section shall be provided no later than:

(i)

Ten (10) days after certification of the:

(a)

General primary election; or

(b)

If no general primary election will be held, the preferential primary election; and

(ii)

One hundred (100) days before the general election.

(2)

At the same time, the county board of election commissioners shall certify to the Secretary of State and the secretary of the state committee the results of the contests for all United States, state, and district offices. Immediately after ascertaining the results for all United States, state, and district offices, the Secretary of State shall certify to the state committee a list of all nominated candidates for the offices.

(h)(1)(A)

The Secretary of State shall at least one hundred (100) days before the date of the general election notify by registered mail the chair and secretary of the state committee of the respective political parties that a certificate of nomination is due for all nominated candidates for United States, state, and district offices in order that the candidates' names be placed on the ballot of the general election.

(B)(i)

The state committee shall issue certificates of nomination to all nominated candidates for United States, state, and district offices, who shall file the certificates with the Secretary of State at least ninety (90) days before the general election.

(ii)

However, if the chair and secretary of the state committee of the respective political parties are not properly notified as directed by subdivision (h)(1)(A) of this section, the failure of a candidate to file a certificate of nomination by the deadline shall not prevent that candidate's name from being placed on the ballot of the general election.

(2)(A)

Each county clerk shall at least one hundred (100) days before the date of the general election notify by registered mail the chairs and secretaries of the county committees of the respective political parties that a certified list of all nominated candidates for county, township, and municipal offices is due and shall be filed with the county clerk in order that the candidates' names be placed on the ballot for the general election.

(B)(i)

Each county political party committee shall issue the certified list on behalf of those nominated candidates and submit the certified list to the county clerk and county board of election commissioners at least ninety (90) days before the general election.

(ii)

However, if the chairs and secretaries of the county committees of the respective political parties are not properly notified as directed by subdivision (h)(2)(A) of this section, the failure of a certified list to be filed by the deadline shall not prevent any candidate's name from being placed on the ballot of the general election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 13; 1971, No. 261, § 23; 1971, No. 347, §§ 5-7; 1971, No. 829, §§ 1-3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, §§ 1, 2; 1975, No. 601, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 888, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 448, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-113; Acts 1987, No. 123, §§ 13, 14; 1987, No. 248, §§ 2, 16; 1993, No. 966, § 2; 1995, No. 723, § 2; 1995, No. 724, § 2; 1995, No. 901, § 4; 1997, No. 886, § 3; 2001, No. 1475, § 3; 2003, No. 1165, § 7; 2003, No. 1731, § 4; 2007, No. 1020, § 14; 2007, No. 1049, § 25; 2009, No. 959, § 36; 2011, No. 1185, § 9; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 1; 2017, No. 1088, § 1; 2019, No. 545, § 2; 2019, No. 649, §§ 1-3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 6, provided:

“(a)

To ensure that independent candidates are provided the maximum number of days allowed by law to circulate petitions to qualify as an independent candidate, the provisions of this act are retroactive to August 1, 2015.

“(b)

Signatures on a petition to have the name of a person placed upon the ballot as an independent candidate under §7-7-103 collected between August 11, 2015, and the effective date of this act shall be counted if:

“(1)

The signatures are not otherwise collected in violation of Arkansas law;

“(2)

The signatures otherwise comply with applicable Arkansas law; and

“(3)

The petition is lawfully filed.”

Acts 2015, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 7, provided:

“(a)

This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)

The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)

On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)

The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1020 deleted former (b)(5); deleted former (e) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “(i)(1)(A)” for “(j)(1)(A)” in (i)(1)(B)(ii); and substituted “(i)(1)(A)” for “(j)(2)(A)” in (i)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049, in (c), substituted “first weekday” for “third Tuesday” and “seventh” for “fourteenth” in (1) and (2), and deleted former (5); in (d), substituted “At least seventy (70)” for “No later than forty (40)” and “Secretary of State” for “chairman and secretary of the state committee of the political party”; deleted former (f), and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; in present (i), substituted “one hundred (100)” for “seventy (70)” in (1)(A), “ninety (90)” for “sixty (60)” in (1)(B)(i) and (2)(A), “(i)(1)(A)” for “(j)(1)(A)” in (1)(B)(ii), “eighty (80)” for “forty-five (45) days but not more than fifty-five (55)” in (2)(B)(i), and “(i)(2)(A)” for “(j)(2)(A)” in (2)(B)(ii).

The 2009 amendment inserted (d)(2); in (d)(1), deleted “the ballot” following “shall certify” and substituted “filed party certificates with the Secretary of State” for “qualified with the state committee for election by filing the party pledge and paying the filing fees of the political party”; inserted “by the deadline” in (h)(1)(B)(ii) and (h)(2)(B)(ii); deleted “the county board of election commissioners and” preceding “the county clerk” in (h)(2)(A) and (h)(2)(B)(i); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (c); substituted “seventy-five (75)” for “seventy (70)” in (d)(1) and (d)(2); substituted “one hundred (100)” for “ninety (90)” in (h)(2)(A); and substituted “ninety (90)” for “eighty (80)” in (h)(2)((B)(i).

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “fourth Tuesday in March before” for “second Tuesday in June preceding” in (a); and rewrote (c)(1).

The 2017 amendment substituted “third Tuesday” for “second Tuesday” in (a); and substituted “four (4) weeks” for “three (3) weeks” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 545 rewrote (a), (b), and (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 649 rewrote (f); added the (g)(1)(A) designation; in (g)(1)(A), deleted “nominated” preceding “candidates”, and inserted “who received the most votes or are unopposed on the ballot”; added (g)(1)(B); and, in (h)(2)(B)(i), inserted “political party”, and inserted “and county board of election commissioners”.

Party Pledges.

This section and §7-7-301 leave it up to the political party to determine whether or not a party loyalty oath is required. Baker v. Jacobs, 303 Ark. 460, 798 S.W.2d 63 (1990).

7-7-204. Candidacy for multiple nominations prohibited.

(a)

A person who files as a candidate for nomination by a political party shall not be eligible to:

(1)

Be the nominee of any other political party for the same office during the primary election or the following general or special election; or

(2)

Be an independent or write-in candidate for the same office at the general or special election.

(b)

A person who is certified as an independent candidate shall not be eligible to be a write-in candidate or the nominee of any political party for the same office at the same general or special election.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 343, § 1.

7-7-205. Petition requirements for new political parties.

(a)(1)

A group desiring to form a new political party shall do so by filing a petition with the Secretary of State.

(2)

The petition shall contain at the time of filing the signatures of registered voters in an amount that equals or exceeds three percent (3%) of the total votes cast for the Office of Governor in the immediately preceding general election for Governor.

(3)

The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any new party petition that is not prima facie sufficient at the time of filing.

(4)(A)

No signature shall be counted unless the date of the signature appears on the petition.

(B)

No signature that is dated more than ninety (90) days before the date the petition is submitted shall be counted.

(5)(A)

The petition shall declare the intent of organizing a political party, the name of which shall be stated in the declaration.

(B)

No political party or group shall assume a name or designation that is so familiar, in the opinion of the Secretary of State, as to confuse or mislead the voters at an election.

(6)

A new political party that wishes to select nominees for the next general election shall file a sufficient petition no later than sixty (60) days before the party filing period.

(b)(1)

The Secretary of State shall determine the sufficiency of the signatures submitted within thirty (30) days of filing.

(2)

If the petition is determined to be insufficient, the Secretary of State shall forthwith notify the sponsors in writing, through their designated agent, and shall set forth his or her reasons for so finding.

(c)(1)

Upon certification of sufficiency of the petition by the Secretary of State, a new political party shall be declared by the Secretary of State.

(2)(A)

A new political party formed by the petition process shall nominate candidates by convention for the first general election after certification.

(B)(i)

A convention under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall be held no later than 12:00 noon on the date of the preferential primary election.

(ii)

Certificates of nomination shall be filed with the Secretary of State or the county clerk no later than 12:00 noon on the date of the preferential primary election.

(C)

A convention under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section may be held in any manner authorized by the rules of the new political party.

(3)

A candidate to be nominated by convention shall file a political practices pledge with the Secretary of State or county clerk, as the case may be, during the party filing period.

(4)

If the new party maintains party status by obtaining three percent (3%) of the total votes cast for the office of Governor or nominees for presidential electors at the first general election after certification, the new political party shall nominate candidates in the party primary as set forth in §7-7-101 et seq.

(5)

Any challenges to the certification of the sufficiency of the petition by the Secretary of State shall be filed with the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 886, § 4; 2003, No. 1165, §§ 8, 9; 2007, No. 821, § 1; 2009, No. 188, § 2; 2009, No. 959, § 37; 2011, No. 1036, § 2; 2013, No. 1356, § 2; 2017, No. 297, § 1; 2019, No. 164, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “to the signatures of at least ten thousand (10,000) registered voters in the state” for “to at least three percent (3%) of the total number of votes cast for the office of Governor or nominees for presidential electors, whichever is less, at the last preceding election” in (a)(2); substituted “any sixty-day period” for “the period beginning one hundred fifty (150) days prior to the deadline for filing the petitions with the Secretary of State” in (a)(4); deleted former (c) and (f) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and rewrote present (d).

The 2009 amendment by No. 188 substituted “ninety-day” for “sixty-day” in (a)(4).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 deleted “qualified electors of this state equal in number to the signatures of” following “signatures of” in (a)(2).

The 2011 amendment rewrote (a)(4); redesignated former (b) as present (a)(5); deleted “and of participating in the next general election” following “declaration” in (a)(5)(A); added (a)(6); redesignated former (c) and (d) as present (b)(1) and (b)(2); redesignated former (e) as present (c); inserted “of the petition” in present (c)(1); inserted “general” preceding “election” in present (c)(2) and (c)(4); redesignated former (f) as present (c)(5); and inserted “the sufficiency of the petition by” in (c)(5).

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(6), substituted “sixty (60)” for “forty-five (45)” and “party filing period” for “preferential primary election”; substituted “during the party filing period” for “no later than noon of the date of the preferential primary election” in (c)(3).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (c)(2) as (c)(2)(A); added (c)(2)(B) and (c)(2)(C); and inserted “to be” in (c)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “registered voters in an amount that equals or exceeds three percent (3%) of the total votes cast for the Office of Governor in the immediately preceding general election for Governor” for “at least ten thousand (10,000) registered voters in the state” in (a)(2).

Cross References.

Election of President of the United States and Vice President of the United States §7-8-302.

Subchapter 3

— Conduct of Primary

Cross References.

Preelection proceedings, §7-5-201 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 41, § 4: Feb. 18, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present requirements that primary election officials reside in the ward or voting precinct in which such official is appointed to serve is unreasonably restrictive and may result in it being very difficult to obtain election officials to conduct primary elections in this state and that it is essential to the proper and efficient conduct of such election that this requirement be removed immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 157, § 10: Feb. 20, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws of the state, that separate or common polling places cannot be established by county committees in counties using voting machines without attendant substantial costs; that it is essential to the proper and economical administration of the election laws of this state that legislation be enacted immediately to provide that respective county committees or county election commissions in counties using voting machines may designate separate and/or common polling places where all elections can be held and to provide for a minimum number of election officials to serve at such polling places so that substantial economies can be realized in the conduct of such elections. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 901, § 21: Apr. 4, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state should provide for a state supported political primary system; and that this act should become effective immediately for the proper administration of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 928 and 936, § 3: Jan. 1, 1996.

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, § 14: Jan. 1, 1996.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, §
8: May 29, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that independent candidates may circulate petitions for candidacy for ninety (90) days before the deadline for filing as a candidate for office; and that without an emergency clause, the effective date of this act will cause confusion regarding the rights and interests of independent candidates and the time period for circulating petitions for candidacy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-7-301. Party pledges, affidavits of eligibility, and party filing fees.

(a)

A political party may impose a filing fee for candidates seeking nomination by that party. The filing fee for county, municipal, and township offices shall be fixed by the county committee, as authorized by the state executive committee. For all other races, the filing fee shall be established by the state executive committee. On or before noon of the last day of the political party filing period, all candidates at primary elections of political parties shall file an affidavit of eligibility and any pledge required by such party and shall pay the party filing fees required by the party, as follows:

(1)

Candidates for United States Senator, for United States Representative, and for all state offices shall file the pledge and the affidavit of eligibility and pay the party filing fees with the secretary of the state committee of the political party or his or her designated agent;

(2)

Candidates for district offices, including, but not limited to, the offices of State Representative and State Senator, shall file the pledge and affidavit of eligibility with the secretary of the state committee of the political party or his or her designated agent and pay the party filing fees with the secretary of the state committee of the political party or his or her designated agent; and

(3)

All candidates for county, municipal, and township offices, candidates for county committee member, and delegates to the county convention shall file the pledge and the affidavit of eligibility and pay the party filing fees with the secretary of the county committee of the political party.

(b)

The county clerk shall not accept for filing the political practices pledge of any candidate for nomination by a political party to any county, township, or partisan municipal office, nor shall the Secretary of State accept for filing the political practices pledge of any candidate for nomination by a political party to any state or district office, unless the candidate first files a party certificate.

(c)

Any candidate who shall fail to file the party pledge and affidavit of eligibility and pay the party filing fee at the time and in the manner as provided in this section shall not receive a party certificate and shall not have his or her name printed on the ballot at any primary election.

(d)

The names of candidates who file with the state committee as provided in this section shall be certified to the various county committees and the various county boards of election commissioners in the manner and at the time provided in §7-7-203.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 9; 1977, No. 169, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-109; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 5; 1997, No. 886, § 5; 2003, No. 1731, § 5; 2009, No. 1480, § 43.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “affidavits of eligibility” in the section heading; inserted “and the affidavit of eligibility” or variants throughout; rewrote the last sentence of the introductory language of (a); deleted (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; inserted “receive a party certificate and shall not” in (c); and substituted “§7-7-203” for “§7-7-203(d)” in (d).

Party Pledges.

This legislation and §7-7-203 leave it up to the political party to determine whether or not a party loyalty oath is required. Baker v. Jacobs, 303 Ark. 460, 798 S.W.2d 63 (1990).

7-7-302. Selection of primary election officials.

The election officials of primary elections shall be selected in the same manner as for general elections and shall be subject to the same requirements as provided for general elections.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, §§ 4, 12; 1971, No. 261, § 6; 1971, No. 451, § 1; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 41, § 1; 1983, No. 395, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-104, 3-112; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 6; 1997, No. 886, § 6.

7-7-303. Precincts — Boundaries.

The election precincts in all political party primary elections shall be the same as established by the county board of election commissioners for general elections.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 11; 1971, No. 261, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-111; Acts 1989, No. 912, § 4; 1995, No. 901, § 7; 2009, No. 959, § 38.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (b).

7-7-304. Names to be included on ballots — Withdrawal — Unopposed candidates — Designation of position — Necessity of general primary.

(a)(1)

The Secretary of State shall certify to all county boards of election commissioners full lists of the names of all candidates who have filed party certificates with him or her to be placed on the ballots in their respective counties at the preferential primary election not less than:

(A)

Seventy-five (75) days before a preferential primary election that is held in May under §7-7-203; and

(B)

Ninety-two (92) days before a preferential primary election that is held in March under §7-7-203.

(2)

A name of a person shall not be certified and shall not be placed on the ballot if prior to the certification deadline a candidate:

(A)

Notifies the Secretary of State in writing, signed by the candidate and acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgements, of his or her desire to withdraw as a candidate for the office or position; or

(B)

Dies.

(b)(1)

The county clerk shall certify to the county board of election commissioners full lists of the names of all candidates who have filed party certificates with him or her to be placed on the ballot at the preferential primary election not less than:

(A)

Seventy-five (75) days before a preferential primary election that is held in May under §7-7-203; and

(B)

Ninety-two (92) days before a preferential primary election that is held in March under §7-7-203.

(2)

A name of a person shall not be certified and shall not be placed on the ballot if prior to the certification deadline a candidate:

(A)

Notifies the county clerk in writing, signed by the candidate and acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgements, of his or her desire to withdraw as a candidate for the office or position; or

(B)

Dies.

(c)(1)

The votes received by a person whose name appeared on the preferential primary ballot and who withdrew or died after the certification of the ballot shall be counted.

(2)

If the person receives enough votes to win the nomination, a vacancy in nomination shall exist.

(3)

If the person receives enough votes to advance to the general primary election, the person's name shall be printed on the general primary election ballot.

(4)

If the person receives enough votes to win the general primary election, a vacancy in nomination shall exist.

(d)

When only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position, the office or position and the name of the unopposed candidate shall be printed on the political party's ballot in all primary elections.

(e)(1)

When there are two (2) or more nominees to be selected for the same office, such as state senator, state representative, justice of the peace, council member, or for any other office, the proper committee shall require the candidates to designate in writing a particular position, i.e., “position number one (1)”, “position number two (2)”, “position number three (3)”, etc., at the time that a party pledge is required to be filed with the secretary of the committee.

(2)

When a candidate has once filed and designated for a certain position, that candidate shall not be permitted to thereafter change the position.

(f)(1)

If at the preferential primary election for a political party a candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for that office or position, the person shall be declared the party nominee and it shall not be necessary for the candidate's name to appear on the ballot at the general primary election.

(2)

If no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for an office or position at the preferential primary for a political party, the names of the two (2) candidates of the political party who received the highest number of votes for an office or a position shall be placed upon the ballots at the general primary election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 10; 1971, No. 261, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-110; Acts 1989, No. 912, § 5; 1995, No. 901, § 8; 2003, No. 332, § 1; 2007, No. 1020, § 15; 2007, No. 1049, § 26; 2009, No. 1480, § 44; 2011, No. 1185, § 10; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 2; 2017, No. 730, § 4; 2017, No. 879, § 2; 2019, No. 545, § 3; 2019, No. 1013, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 6, provided:

“(a)

To ensure that independent candidates are provided the maximum number of days allowed by law to circulate petitions to qualify as an independent candidate, the provisions of this act are retroactive to August 1, 2015.

“(b)

Signatures on a petition to have the name of a person placed upon the ballot as an independent candidate under §7-7-103 collected between August 11, 2015, and the effective date of this act shall be counted if:

“(1)

The signatures are not otherwise collected in violation of Arkansas law;

“(2)

The signatures otherwise comply with applicable Arkansas law; and

“(3)

The petition is lawfully filed.”

Acts 2015, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 7, provided:

“(a)

This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)

The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)

On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)

The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1020 substituted “Secretary of State” for “State Board of Election Commissioners” in (b); and deleted “or place” following the second occurrence of “office” in (d).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049 added (b)(2) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy-five (75)” for “seventy (70)” in (a)(1) and (b)(1); inserted “deadline” in (a)(2) and (b)(2); and subdivided (e).

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “ninety-two (92)” for “seventy-five (75)” in (a)(1) and (b)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 730, in (d), inserted “it is not necessary for”, and substituted “to be printed” for “shall be printed”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 879, in (e)(1), substituted “council member” for “alderman” and substituted “position number one, position number two, position number three” for “Position Number 1, Position Number 2, Position Number 3”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 545, in (a)(1), substituted “The Secretary of State” for “Not less than seventy-five (75) days before each preferential primary election, the Secretary of State” and added “not less than”; added (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); in (b)(1), substituted “The county clerk” for “Not less than seventy-five (75) days before each preferential primary election, the county clerk” and added “not less than”; and added (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1013, in (d), substituted “the office or position and the name of the unopposed candidate shall be printed” for “it is not necessary for the office or position and the name of the unopposed candidate to be printed”.